Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4117
Discharge of Public Guardian; when.

The Public
Guardian may be discharged by a court with respect to any of the authority
granted over a ward or protected person upon petition of such individual,
any interested party, or the Public Guardian or upon the court's own motion
when it appears that the services of the Public Guardian are no longer necessary.

Laws 2014, LB920, § 17.

Once the Office of the Public Guardian has been appointed by the court, it may be discharged on the ground its services are no longer necessary only when it shows (1) the ward is no longer incapacitated and in need of a guardian or (2) it has located a successor guardian who is qualified, available, and willing to become a guardian. In re Guardianship of Nicholas H., 309 Neb. 1, 958 N.W.2d 661 (2021).